Hawaii statutes.
§201-3 Specific research and promotional
functions of the department. Without prejudice to its general functions
and duties, the department of business, economic development, and tourism shall
have specific functions in the following areas:

(1) Industrial development. The department shall:

(A) Determine through technical and economic
surveys the profit potential of new or expanded industrial undertakings;

(B) Develop through research projects and
other means new and improved industrial products and processes;

(C) Promote studies and surveys to determine
consumer preference as to design and quality and to determine the best methods
of packaging, transporting, and marketing the State's industrial products;

(D) Disseminate information to assist the
present industries of the State, to attract new industries to the State, and to
encourage capital investment in present and new industries in the State;

(E) Assist associations of producers and
distributors of industrial products to introduce these products to consumers;
and

(F) Make grants or contracts as may be
necessary or advisable to accomplish the foregoing;

(2) Land development. The department shall:

(A) Encourage the most productive use of all
land in the State in accordance with a general plan developed by the
department;

(B) Encourage the improvement of land tenure
practices on leased private lands;

(C) Promote an informational program directed
to landowners, producers of agricultural and industrial commodities, and the
general public regarding the most efficient and most productive use of the
lands in the State; and

(D) Make grants or contracts as may be
necessary or advisable to accomplish the foregoing;

(3) Credit development. The department shall:

(A) Conduct a continuing study of
agricultural and industrial credit needs;

(B) Encourage the development of additional
private and public credit sources for agricultural and industrial enterprises;

(C) Promote an informational program to
acquaint financial institutions with agricultural and industrial credit needs
and the potential for agricultural and industrial expansion, and inform
producers of agricultural and industrial products as to the manner in which to
qualify for loans; and

(D) Make grants or contracts as may be necessary
or advisable to accomplish the foregoing;

(4) Promotion. The department shall:

(A) Disseminate information developed for or
by the department pertaining to economic development to assist present industry
in the State;

(B) Attract new industry and investments to
the State; and

(C) Assist new and emerging industry with
good growth potential or prospects in jobs, exports, and new products.

The industrial and economic promotional
activities of the department may include the use of literature, advertising,
demonstrations, displays, market testing, lectures, travel, motion picture and
slide films, and other promotional and publicity devices as may be appropriate;
and

(5) Self-sufficiency standard. The department shall
establish and update biennially a self-sufficiency standard that shall
incorporate existing methods of calculation, and shall reflect, at a minimum,
costs relating to housing, food, child care, transportation, health care,
clothing and household expenses, federal and state tax obligations, family
size, children's ages, geography, and the number of household wage earners.
The department shall report to the legislature concerning the self-sufficiency
standard no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular
session of 2009, and every odd-numbered year thereafter. The recommendations
shall address, among other things, the use of any federal funding that may be
available for the purposes of establishing and updating the self-sufficiency
standard.

The department shall be the central agency to
coordinate film permit activities in the State. [L 1955, c 264, pt of §1; RL
1955, §28A-6; am L 1957, c 23, §5; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §§10, 25; am L 1963, c
2, §3; HRS §201-3; am L 1974, c 85, §1; am L 1977, c 12, §1; am L 1981, c 98, §5;
am L 1983, c 235, §2; am L 1984, c 81, §1; am L 1987, c 336, §7; am L 1990, c
293, §8; am L 1996, c 166, §4; am L 1998, c 156, §6 and c 176, §8; am L Sp
2008, c 12, §2; am L Sp 2009, c 5, §3]

Revision Note

Paragraph (5)
redesignated pursuant to §23G-15(1).

Cross References

Firearms permit for
motion picture and television production, see §134-2.5.

New industry
training, see §394-8.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next